Massachusetts, session 194th, H1927.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the resolves of 1957, as amended by section 105 of chapter 
126 of the acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “Elizabeth 
Johnson, Jr.” the first time they appear, the following words:- , “Margaret Jones, Alice Lake, 
Elizabeth Kendall, Anne Hibbens, Goody Glover,” 
SECTION 2. Said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by striking the words “in the 
year sixteen hundred and ninety-two” in the first paragraph. 
SECTION 3. Said chapter 145 is hereby further amended by inserting after the words 
“The above named”, the following words:- “and other”.  
SECTION 4. Said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by inserting after the first 
paragraph the following paragraph :- “Whereas, Hugh Parsons, Eunice Cole, and Elizabeth 
Morse were indicted, tried, and found guilty of “Witchcraft”; and” 

of 2 12  SECTION 5. Said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by inserting after the second 
paragraph :- “Whereas, numerous others were named, accused, arrested, questioned, imprisoned, 
arraigned, presented, indicted and/or tried for witchcraft or familiarity with the devil, though not 
found guilty; and” 
SECTION 6. Said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by inserting after the words 
“Elizabeth Johnson, Jr.” the second time they appear, the following words:- , “Margaret Jones, 
Alice Lake, Elizabeth Kendall, Anne Hibbens, Goody Glover, Hugh Parsons, Eunice Cole, 
Elizabeth Morse”.